Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-514
Payments; to whom made.

Payments of assistance with respect to any dependent child shall be made to any person or persons in whose home the residence of such child is maintained.

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 30, § 14, p. 186;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 43-514;

R.S.1943, § 43-514;

Laws 1969, c. 344, § 2, p. 1210;

Laws 1973, LB 159, § 2;

Laws 1982, LB 522, § 15.